Hawaii statutes.
§651-124 Pension money exempt. The
right of a debtor to a pension, annuity, retirement or disability allowance,
death benefit, any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing
under any retirement plan or arrangement described in section 401(a), 401(k),
403(a), 403(b), 408, 408A, 409 (as in effect prior to January 1, 1984), 414(d),
or 414(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or any fund created
by the plan or arrangement, or any ABLE savings account established pursuant to
chapter 256B, shall be exempt from attachment, execution, seizure, the
operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws under title 11 United States Code
section 522(b), or under any legal process. However, this section shall not
apply to:

(1) A "qualified domestic relations order"
as defined in section 206(d) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of
1974, as amended, or in section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended; and

(2) Contributions made to a plan or arrangement
within the three years before the date a debtor files for bankruptcy, whether
voluntary or involuntary, or within three years before the date a civil action
is initiated against the debtor, except for contributions to a retirement plan
established by state statute if the effect would be to eliminate a state
employee's retirement service credit. [L 1986, c 289, §1; am L 2004, c 34, §1;
am L 2005, c 152, §2; am L 2015, c 206, §3; am L 2016, c 55, §32]

Case Notes

Section 206(d)(1) of ERISA erects a general bar to the garnishment
of pension benefits from ERISA-covered plans; insofar as compliance with both
section 206(d)(1) of ERISA and the exception to this section is "a
physical impossibility", the exception to this section is preempted to the
extent that it actually conflicts with ERISA. 90 H. 345, 978 P.2d 783 (1999).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next